District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-539

Administration; annual report to Council.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-100, § 10, 29 DCR 969
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-243, § 20, 44 DCR 1142
1981 Ed., § 3-409.
See note to § 4-531.